Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202679-308
Commissioner of Education; teacher's institutes and conferences.

The Commissioner of Education shall organize institutes and conferences at such times and places as he or she deems practicable. He or she shall, as far as practicable, attend such institutes and conferences, provide proper instructors for the same, and in other ways seek to improve the efficiency of teachers and advance the cause of education in the state.

Laws 1881, c. 78, subdivision VIII, § 2, p. 363;

R.S.1913, § 6899;

C.S.1922, § 6475;

C.S.1929, § 79-1602;

R.S.1943, § 79-1605;

Laws 1949, c. 256, § 25, p. 700;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-304;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 136;

Laws 2015, LB525, § 7;

Laws 2021, LB528, § 22;

Laws 2026, LB937, § 6.
July 18, 2026